en: Vitamin waters
bg: Витаминни води
hr: Vitaminske vode
hu: Vitaminos vizek, Vitaminos víz
nl: Vitaminewaters
sv: Vitaminvatten

it: Grappa della Valle d’Aosta
fr: Grappa de la Vallée d’Aoste

en: Orujo
es: Orujo

en: Torkolypalinka
hu: Törkölypálinka

en: Tsipouro
el: Τσίπουρο
fr: Tsípouro

en: Wines
bg: Вино
ca: Vins
cs: Vína
da: Vin
de: Weine
es: Vinos
fi: viinit
fr: Vins, vin
he: יינות
hr: vina, vino
hu: Borok, Bor
it: Vini
ja: ワイン, ぶどう酒, 葡萄酒
lt: Vynas, Vynai
nl: Wijnen, Wijn
pl: Wina
pt: Vinhos
ru: Вина, Вино
sv: Viner, vin
th: ไวน์
tr: Şarap
zh: 葡萄酒

en: Vegan wines, Vegan-friendly wines
da: Veganske vin
sv: Veganska viner

en: Cooking wines
de: Kochweine
es: Vinos de cocina
fr: Vins de cuisine
hr: Kuhanje vina
hu: Főzőborok, Főzőbor
it: Vini da cucina
nl: Kookwijnen

en: Wine without geographic indication
de: Wein ohne geografische Angabe
es: Vino sin indicación geográfica
fr: Vin sans indication géographique, VSIG (Vin sans indication géographique), VSIG
hr: Vino bez oznake zemljopisnog podrijetla
hu: Földrajzi eredetmegjelölés nélküli borok
it: Vino senza indicazione geografica
nl: Wijnen zonder geografische oorsprong indicatie

fr: Fontaines à vin
de: Weinbrunnen
es: Fuentes de vino
it: Fontane di vino
nl: Wijnfonteinen

en: Federweisser
cs: Burčák
de: Federweißer, Neuer Wein
eo: Nova vino
es: Federweisser
fr: Vin bourru
hr: Federweisser
hu: Murci
nl: Nieuwe wijnen, Nieuwe wijn
pl: Burčák
sw: Federweisser

en: Sparkling wines
de: Schaumweine, Schaumwein
es: Vinos espumosos
fi: kuohuviinit
fr: Vins effervescents
hr: Pjenušava vina
hu: Pezsgők, Pezsgő
it: Spumanti, Vini spumanti, Vini frizzanti
ja: スパークリングワイン
lt: Putojantis vynas
nl: Mousserende wijnen, Schuimwijn, Bubbelwijn
pl: Wina musujące
pt: Vinho frisante

en: French sparkling wines
bg: Френски игристи вина
ca: Vins escumosos francesos
cs: Francouzské šumivé vína
da: Franske mousserende vine
de: Französische Schaumweine
es: Vinos espumosos franceses
fi: ranskalaiset kuohuviinit
fr: Vins pétillants français, Vins effervescents français
he: יינות קידוח צרפתיים
hr: Francuska pjenušava vina
hu: Francia pezsgők
it: Spumanti francesi
ja: フランス産スパークリングワイン
lt: Prancūzijos putliniai vynai
nl: Franse mousserende wijnen
pl: Francuskie wina musujące
pt: Vinhos espumantes franceses
ru: Французские игристые вина
sv: Franska mousserande viner
th: ไวน์อัดแก๊สฝรั่งเศส
tr: Fransız şampanyaları
zh: 法国起泡酒

en: Red wines, red wine
bg: Червено вино
ca: Vi negre
de: Roteweine
es: Vinos tintos, Vino tinto
fi: punaviinit
fr: vins rouges, vin rouge
he: יינות אדומים
hr: Crvena vina
hu: Vörösborok, Vörösbor
it: Vini rossi
ja: 赤ワイン
lt: Raudonas vynas
nl: Rode wijnen, Rode wijn
pl: Wina czerwone, Czerwone wino, Czerwone wina
pt: Vinhos tintos, vinho tinto
ru: Красные вина
tr: Kırmızı şarap
zh: 红葡萄酒, 红酒

en: Organic red wines
de: Bio-Rotweine
es: Vinos tintos orgánicos
fi: Luomupunaviinit
fr: Vin rouge bio
hr: Organska crna vina
hu: Bio vörösborok, Bio vörösbor
it: Vini rossi biologici
nl: Biologische rode wijn
pt: Vinhos tintos orgânicos
ru: Органические красные вина
zh: 有机红葡萄酒, 有机红酒

en: 10% red wine
de: 10% Rotwein
es: Vino tinto al 10%
fr: Vin rouge à 10°, Vin rouge à 10 degrés
hr: 10% crnog vina
hu: 10%-os vörösbor
it: Vino rosso al 10%
nl: 10% rode wijn
pt: 10% vinho tinto
ru: 10% красное вино
zh: 10% 红葡萄酒

en: 11% red wine
bg: 11% червено вино
ca: Vi negre 11%
de: 11% Rotwein
es: Vino tinto 11%, Vino tinto al 11%
fi: 11% punaviini
fr: Vin rouge à 11°, Vin rouge à 11 degrés
hr: 11% crnog vina
hu: 11%-os vörösbor
it: Vino rosso 11%, Vino rosso al 11%
ja: 11% 赤ワイン
lt: 11% raudonas vynas
nl: 11% rode wijn
pl: 11% czerwone wino
pt: Vinho tinto 11%
ru: 11% красное вино
tr: 11% kırmızı şarap
zh: 11% 红葡萄酒

en: 12% red wine
bg: 12% червено вино
ca: Vi negre 12%
de: 12% Rotwein
es: Vino tinto 12%
fi: 12% punaviini
fr: Vin rouge à 12°, Vin rouge à 12 degrés
hr: 12% crnog vina
hu: 12%-os vörösbor
it: Vino rosso 12%
ja: 12% 赤ワイン
lt: 12% raudonas vynas
nl: 12% rode wijn
pl: 12% czerwone wino
pt: Vinho tinto 12%
ru: 12% красное вино
tr: 12% kırmızı şarap
zh: 12% 红葡萄酒

en: 13% red wine
bg: 13% червено вино
ca: Vi negre 13%
de: 13% Rotwein
es: Vino tinto 13%
fi: 13% punaviini
fr: Vin rouge à 13°, Vin rouge à 13 degrés
hr: 13% crnog vina
hu: 13%-os vörösbor
it: Vino rosso 13%
ja: 13% 赤ワイン
lt: 13% raudonas vynas
nl: 13% rode wijn
pl: 13% czerwone wino
pt: Vinho tinto 13%
ru: 13% красное вино
tr: 13% kırmızı şarap
zh: 13% 红葡萄酒

en: White wines, White wine
af: Witwyn
bg: Бяло вино
ca: Vi blanc
cy: Gwin gwyn
da: Hvidvin
de: Weißwein
es: Vinos blancos
eu: Ardo zuri
fa: شراب سفید
fi: Valkoviini
fo: Hvítvín
fr: Vins blancs, Vin blanc
gl: Viño branco
hr: Bijela vina
hu: Fehérborok, Fehérbor
it: Vino bianco
ja: 白ワイン
kk: Ақ шарап
ko: 백포도주
lb: Wäisse Wäin
lt: Baltasis vynas
nl: Witte wijnen, Witte wijn
no: Hvitvin
pl: Wina białe, Wino białe, Białe wino
pt: Vinho branco
ru: Белое вино
sr: Бијело вино
sv: Vitt vin
uk: Біле вино
vi: Rượu vang trắng
zh: 白葡萄酒